Arkansas, session 2025, HB1759.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-26-1408(a)(2)(A), concerning the time
for the assessment and payment of property taxes, is amended to read as
follows:
(2)(A) Taxable tangible personal property of a new resident and
a new business established between January 1 and May 31 and taxable tangible
personal property acquired by a resident during the period from January 1
through May 31, except tangible personal property acquired during the period
of May 2 April 1 through May 31, shall be assessable without delinquency
within thirty (30) sixty (60) days following the date of its acquisition.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-26-1408(a)(3), concerning the time for
the assessment and payment of property taxes, is amended to read as follows:
(3) The ten percent (10%) penalty for delinquent assessment
*JLL304*
03/12/2025 2:20:20 PM JLL304

HB1759
shall not apply to tangible personal property becoming eligible for
assessment through May 31 if the tangible personal property is assessed on or
before May 31, except that:
(A) If May 31 of an assessment year falls on a Saturday,
Sunday, or postal holiday, then the last day to assess without incurring a
penalty shall be the following business day; and
(B) Tangible personal property acquired during the period
of May 2 April 1 through May 31 shall be assessable without penalty within
thirty (30) sixty (60) days following the date of its acquisition.



























03/12/2025 2:20:20 PM JLL304